Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.020

Alternative methods of financing.

If the city council or commission desires to make any improvement authorized by the provisions of this chapter it shall provide therefor by ordinance and unless the ordinance provides that the improvement shall be paid for wholly or in part by special assessment upon the property benefited, compensation therefor shall be made from any general or special funds of the city applicable thereto. If the ordinance provides that the improvement shall be paid for wholly or in part by special assessments upon property benefited, the proceedings for the making of such special assessment shall be as hereafter provided.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.56.020. Prior: 1913 c 16 s 2, part; RRS s 9450, part.]

NOTES:

Special assessments or taxation for local improvements: State Constitution Art. 7 s 9.